Hawaii, session 2025, HB445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the city and county of Honolulu has experienced a steady increase in the number of residents and visitors over the past decade, with a population growth rate of 6.6 per cent from 2010 to 2020, the highest of all counties.  The city and county of Honolulu is now home to more than one million individuals, and its existing infrastructure is insufficient to support the increase in residents and visitors.  Specifically, a lack outdoor spaces for community activities are persistent problems for residents and visitors.  The legislature further finds that there are lands within the city and county of Honolulu that can be better utilized for economic development and to address community needs. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the department of business, economic development, and tourism to purchase certain properties to be used for economic development and community needs. SECTION 2.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall exercise its power of eminent domain under chapter 101, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to acquire tax map key parcels listed in section 3 of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the department of business, economic development, and tourism to exercise its power of eminent domain under chapter 101, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to acquire the following tax map key parcels to be used for economic development and community needs, as deemed necessary by the department: (1)  1-2-6-024-034-0000; (2)  1-2-6-024-035-0000; (3)  1-2-6-024-036-0000; (4)  1-2-6-024-037-0000; (5)  1-2-6-024-038-0000; (6)  1-2-6-024-039-0000; (7)  1-2-6-024-040-0000; (8)  1-2-6-024-042-0000; (9)  1-2-6-024-043-0000; (10)  1-2-6-024-044-0000; (11)  1-2-6-024-045-0000; (12)  1-2-6-024-065-0000; (13)  1-2-6-024-066-0000; (14)  1-2-6-024-067-0000; (15)  1-2-6-024-068-0000; (16)  1-2-6-024-080-0000; (17)  1-2-6-024-081-0000; (18)  1-2-6-024-082-0000; and (19)  1-2-6-024-083-0000. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________